Massachusetts, session 194th, H701.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 15 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 67. (a) The department of education, hereinafter referred to as the department, 
shall establish a grant program, subject to appropriation, to be known as the language education 
grant program for the purpose of providing grants to assist school districts, Horace Mann and 
commonwealth charter schools with the development of expanded world language, second 
language, heritage language, and English language learner education programs in schools. The 
grants shall be used to help students succeed academically and increase access to language 
education. The grants shall also encourage voluntary expansion of existing foreign language 
programs in the commonwealth. The department shall develop guidelines governing the grant 
program and guidelines for implementation of said program. 
(b) Applicants shall be commonwealth school districts, Horace Mann and commonwealth 
charter schools.  

of 2 13  (c) The commissioner shall evaluate annually programs established under this section 
including the potential for replicating such programs throughout the commonwealth. The 
commissioner shall also provide technical assistance to school districts seeking to replicate 
programs funded under said section.